District of Columbia statutes.
4-345

Benefits.

(a)

A foster parent may receive the following:

(1)

A voucher for the payment of $1,500 for a homestudy for each foster child or related sibling group; and

(2)

A voucher for the payment of $5,000 for attorneys’ fees for each foster child or related sibling group; provided that, the voucher may only be applied to attorney’s fees charged at an hourly rate of not more than $125 per hour and related expenses billed at actual cost.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to create an entitlement to financial assistance for the adoption of a foster child, or foster children, if no funds remain available in the Adoption Voucher Fund.

(c)

Vouchers issued pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and may not limit the amount of, money available to a foster parent under § 4-301.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3806, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3806 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3802 to 3807 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).